src/fst/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! # Adverbs for Northern Mansi
! --------------------

!! No work on adverbs yet.

LEXICON ADV_
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** either to # or via Comp нув to #
:        #   ;
+Comp:%>нув        #   ;

!LEXICON ADV_ABL
!+Abl: K ;

LEXICON ADV_DEG
+Deg: K ;

!LEXICON ADV_LAT
!+Lat: K ;

!LEXICON ADV_LOC
!+Loc: K ;

LEXICON ADV_AUX
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** gets +Aux tag
+Aux:        #   ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
